en: Chestnut yogurts
de: Kastanien-Joghurt
es: Yogures de castaña
fi: Kastanjajogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la châtaigne, Yaourts aux marrons
hr: Jogurti od kestena
it: Yogurt alla castagna
lt: Kaštonų jogurtai, Jogurtai su kaštonais
nl: Kastanjeyoghurts, Kastanjeyoghurt
pt: Iogurtes de castanha
ro: Iaurturi cu castane

en: Chocolate chunks yogurts, Chocolate yogurts, Fermented milk yogurt with chocolate shavings and cream and sugar, Dairy specialty with chocolate shavings and cream and sugar, straciatella yogurts, stracciatella yogurts
de: Schokoladenjoghurte
es: Yogures con trozos de chocolate
fr: Yaourts aux copeaux de chocolat, yaourts au chocolat, Yaourt sucré au lait fermenté aux copeaux de chocolat et à la crème, Spécialité laitière aux copeaux de chocolat et à la crème, Yaourts à la straciatella, Yaourt à la stracciatella
hr: Komadići čokolade jogurti
hu: Csokoládés joghurtok
it: Yogurt al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai jogurtai, Jogurtai su šokolado gabaliukais
nl: Yoghurt met chocolade
ro: Iaurturi cu ciocolată

en: Caramel yogurts
de: Karamell-Joghurt
es: Yogures de caramelo
fr: Yaourts au caramel
hr: Karamel jogurti
hu: Karamellás joghurtok
it: Yogurt al caramello
lt: Karameliniai jogurtai, Jogurtai su karamele
nl: Yoghurt met caramel
pt: Iogurtes de caramelo

en: Honey yogurts
de: Honig-Joghurt
es: Yougures con miel
fi: Hunajajogurtit
fr: Yaourts au miel
hr: Jogurti od meda
hu: Mézes joghurtok
it: Yogurt al miele
lt: Jogurtai su Medumi
nl: Honingyoghurts
pt: Iogurtes com mel
ro: Iaurturi cu miere

en: Greek-style yogurts, Greek yogurts, Greek yogurt
ca: Iogurt grec
da: Græsk yoghurt
de: Griechische Joghurt, Griechische Jogurt, Griechische Joghurts, Griechische Jogurts, Griechischer Joghurt
es: Yogures estilo griego, Yogurt al estilo griego, Yogures al estilo griego
fi: Kreikkalaiset jogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la grecque, Yaourt à la grecque
he: יוגורטים יווניים
hr: Jogurti na grčki način
hu: Görög joghurtok
it: Yogurt greco
ja: ギリシャヨーグルト
lt: Graikiški jogurtai
nl: Griekse yoghurts
pt: Iogurtes gregos
ru: Греческий йогурт
zh: 希腊酸奶

en: Greek-style yogurts (plain), Plain greek-style yogurts
fr: Yaourts à la grecque nature, Yaourt à la grecque nature

en: Yogurt Greek-style ewe's milk
fr: Yaourt à la grecque au lait de brebis

en: Yogurts high in protein on a fruit layer, Yoghurts high in protein on a fruit layer
fr: Yaourts sur lit de fruits, yaourts sur lits de fruits, Yaourts sut lit de fruits, Spécialités laitières sucrées riches en protéines sur lit de fruits
hr: Jogurti s visokim udjelom proteina na voćnom sloju
nl: Yoghurts op een laag fruit

en: Greek-style yogurts on a bed of fruits, Greek yogurt on a bed of fruits, Greek-style yogurt on a bed of fruits
fr: Yaourt à la grecque sur lit de fruits, Yaourts à la grecque sur lit de fruits

en: Low-fat yogurts, Yogurt with fruits and 0% fat, Yogurt fruit flavoured with 0% fat, Fermented milk with fruits and 0% fat, Fermented milk fruit flavoured with 0% fat, Dairy specialty with fruits and 0% fat, Dairy specialty fruit flavoured with 0% fat
bg: Нискомаслено кисело мляко
de: fettarme Joghurt, fettarme Jogurt, fettarme Joghurts, fettarme Jogurts
es: Yogures bajos en grasa
fi: Matalarasvaiset jogurtit
fr: Yaourts allégés en matière grasse, Yaourts allégés en matières grasses, Yaourts allégés, Yaourt aromatisé à 0% de matières grasses, Yaourt aux fruits à 0% de matières grasses, Lait fermenté aromatisé à 0% de matières grasses, Lait fermenté aux fruits à 0% de matières grasses, Spécialité laitière aromatisée à 0% de matières grasses, Spécialité laitière aux fruits à 0% de matières grasses
he: יוגורטים דלי שומן
hr: Nemasni jogurti
hu: Alacsony zsírtartalmú joghurtok
it: Yogurt magro
lt: Jogurtai su mažai riebalų
nl: Light youghurts
pt: Iogurtes com baixo teor de gordura

en: Plain low-fat yogurts
fr: Yaourts allégés nature

en: Thermised milk low-fat yogurts, Thermised milk flavoured low-fat yogurts
fr: Yaourts allégés aromatisés au lait thermisé

en: Low-fat flavoured yogurts with UHT milk
fr: Yaourts allégés aromatisés au lait UHT

en: Plain low-fat yogurts with UHT milk
fr: Yaourts allégés nature au lait UHT

en: Mixed yogurts
de: gemischte Joghurt, gemischte Jogurt, gemischte Joghurts, gemischte Jogurts
fr: Yaourts mixés
hr: Miješani jogurti
hu: Vegyes joghurtok
it: Yogurt misti
lt: Maišyti jogurtai, Įvairūs jogurtai
nl: Gemengde yoghurts

en: Cow milk yogurts, Cow milk yogurt, Cow's milk yogurts, Yoghurt from cow milk
bg: Краве кисело мляко
ca: Iogurt de llet de vaca
de: Kuhmilchjoghurt
es: Yogur de leche de vaca
fi: Lehmänmaitojogurtit
fr: Yaourts au lait de vache, Yaourts de vache
he: יוגורט מחלב פרה
hr: Jogurti od kravljeg mlijeka
it: Yogurt di mucca
lt: Karvės pieno jogurtai, Jogurtai iš karvės pieno
nl: Koemelkyoghurts, Koemelkyoghurt
pt: Iogurtes de leite de vaca
ro: Iaurturi din lapte de vacă

en: Sheep milk yogurts, Sheep's milk yogurts, Yoghurt from sheep's milk, sheep's milk yogurt
bg: Овче кисело мляко
ca: Iogurt de llet d'ovella
de: Schafmilchjoghurt, Schafmilchjogurt, Schafmilchjoghurts, Schafmilchjogurts
es: Yogures de leche de oveja
fi: Lampaanmaitojogurtit
fr: Yaourts au lait de brebis, Yaourt au lait de brebis, Yaourts de brebis, Yaourt de brebis
hr: Jogurti od ovčjeg mlijeka
it: Yogurt di pecora
lt: Avies pieno jogurtai, Jogurtai iš avies pieno
nl: Schapenyoghurts
pt: Iogurtes de leite de ovelha
ro: Iaurturi din lapte de oaie
ru: Йогурт из овечьего молока, Йогурты из овечьего молока

en: Plain sheep milk yogurts
fr: Yaourts au lait de brebis nature
nl: Schapenmelkyoghurts (natuur)

en: Plain cow milk yogurts
fr: Yaourts au lait de vache nature
nl: Koeienmelkyoghurts (natuur)

en: Goat milk yogurts, Goat yogurts, goat's milk yogurts
bg: Кисело козе мляко
de: Ziegenmilchjoghurt, Ziegenjoghurt
es: Yogures de leche de cabra
fi: Vuohenmaitojogurtti
fr: Yaourts au lait de chèvre, Yaourts de chèvre
hr: Jogurti od kozjeg mlijeka
it: Yogurt di capra
lt: Ožkos pieno jogurtai, Jogurtai iš ožkos pieno
nl: Geitenmelkyoghurts
pt: Iogurtes de leite de cabra
ro: Iaurturi din lapte de capră